Tennessee, session 114, SB0464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-151, is amended by deleting
the language:
The premium fee for your bond should not be more than ten percent (10%) of the face
amount of your bond. For example, if your bond is $2,500, the premium on the bond
should not be more than $250.
and substituting:
The premium fee for your bond should not be less than five percent (5%) or more than
ten percent (10%) of the face amount of your bond. For example, if your bond is $2,500,
the premium on the bond should not be less than $125 or more than $250.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-316(a), is amended by
deleting the language "more than ten percent (10%) of the amount of the face value of the
bond" and substituting "less than five percent (5%) or more than ten percent (10%) of the
amount of the face value of the bond".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-316(c), is amended by
deleting the language "up to fifteen percent (15%) of the amount of the face value of the bond"
and substituting "no less than five percent (5%) and no more than fifteen percent (15%) of the
amount of the face value of the bond".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0464
002119
- 1 -